Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-614
House numbers.

The mayor and city council may provide for regulating and requiring the numbering of houses along public streets or avenues.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 50, p. 268;

R.S.1913, § 4913;

C.S.1922, § 4081;

C.S.1929, § 16-610;

R.S.1943, § 16-614.